District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.72

Exclusion of opportunity account funds from public assistance program calculations.

Funds in an opportunity account, including accrued interest, shall not be considered in the determination of whether a person is eligible to receive, or the determination of the amount of, any public assistance or benefits.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 13, 48 DCR 1240